Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3005
Occupation tax; addition to other taxes and fees; political subdivision; tax on mechanical amusement devices; prohibited.

(1) The occupation tax levied and imposed by the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act shall be in addition to any and all taxes or fees, of any form whatsoever, now imposed by the State of Nebraska upon the business of operating or distributing mechanical amusement devices, except that payment of the tax and license fees due and owing on or before the licensing date of each year shall exempt any such mechanical amusement device from the application of the sales tax which would or could otherwise be imposed under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Nonpayment of the taxes or fees due and owing on or before the licensing date of each year shall render the exemption provided by this section inapplicable, and the particular mechanical amusement devices shall then be subject to all the provisions of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, including the penalty provisions pertaining to the distributor or operator of such mechanical amusement devices.

(2) No political subdivision of the State of Nebraska shall levy or impose any tax on mechanical amusement devices in addition to the taxes imposed by the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act.

Laws 1969, c. 635, § 5, p. 2543;

Laws 1997, LB 317, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB685, § 11.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.